Utah statutes.
75-1-110.   Cost of living adjustment of certain dollar amounts.
(1)  In this section:
(a)  "CPI" means the Consumer Price Index (Annual Average) for All Urban
Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, reported by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics, United States Department of Labor or its successor or, if the
index is discontinued, an equivalent index reported by a federal authority.
If no such index is reported, the term means the substitute index adopted by
the Administrative Office of the Courts.
(b)  "Reference base index" means the CPI for calendar year 2009.
(2)  The dollar amounts stated in Subsection 75-2-202(2) and Sections
75-2-102, 75-2-402, 75-2-403, and 75-2-405 apply to the estate of a decedent
who died in or after 2010, but for the estate of a decedent who died after
2011, these dollar amounts shall be increased or decreased if the CPI for the
calendar year immediately preceding the year of death exceeds or is less than
the reference base index.  The amount of any increase or decrease is computed
by multiplying each dollar amount by the percentage by which the CPI for the
calendar year immediately preceding the year of death exceeds or is less than
the reference base index.  If any increase or decrease produced by the
computation is not a multiple of $100, the increase or decrease is rounded
down, if an increase, or up, if a decrease, to the next multiple of $100, but
for the purpose of Section 75-2-405, the periodic installment amount is the
lump sum amount divided by 12.  If the CPI for 2009 is changed by the Bureau
of Labor Statistics, the reference base index shall be revised using the
rebasing factor reported by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, or other
comparable data if a rebasing factor is not reported.
(3)  Before February 1, 2011, and before February 1 of each succeeding year,
the Administrative Office of the Courts shall publish a cumulative list,
beginning with the dollar amounts effective for the estate of a decedent who
died in 2011, of each dollar amount as increased or decreased under this
section.
